Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.100

Closing of estate—Alternative decrees—Notice—Hearing—Fees.

(1) When the estate is ready to be closed, the court, upon application by the personal representative who has nonintervention powers, shall make and cause to be entered a decree that either:

(a) Finds and adjudges that all approved claims against the decedent have been paid, finds and adjudges the heirs of the decedent or those persons entitled to take under the decedent's will, and distributes the decedent's property to the persons entitled to it; or

(b) Approves the accounting of the personal representative and settles the estate of the decedent in the manner provided for in the administration of those estates in which the personal representative has not acquired nonintervention powers.

(2) Either decree provided for in this section shall be made after notice given as provided for in the settlement of estates by a personal representative who has not acquired nonintervention powers. The petition for either decree provided for in this section shall state the fees paid or proposed to be paid to the personal representative, the personal representative's attorneys, accountants, and appraisers, and any heir, devisee, or legatee whose interest in the assets of a decedent's estate would be reduced by the payment of said fees shall receive a copy of said petition with the notice of hearing thereon; at the request of the personal representative or any said heir, devisee, or legatee, the court shall, at the time of the hearing on either petition, determine the reasonableness of said fees. The court shall take into consideration all criteria forming the basis for the determination of the amount of such fees as contained in the code of professional responsibility; in determining the reasonableness of the fees charged by any personal representative, accountants, and appraisers the court shall take into consideration the criteria forming the basis for the determination of attorney's fees, to the extent applicable, and any other factors which the court determines to be relevant in the determination of the amount of fees to be paid to such personal representative.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4013; 2010 c 8 s 2058; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 25; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 22.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.